Hawaii statutes.
§469-7 Powers of department to subpoena
witnesses, etc. The department of health may subpoena and examine
witnesses under oath upon all such charges as may be preferred before it, and
the circuit court of the circuit in which the hearing is held shall enforce by
proper proceedings the attendance and testimony of witnesses so subpoenaed. [L
1933, c 36, §6; RL 1935, §1455; RL 1945, §3057; RL 1955, §72-7; am L Sp 1959
2d, c 1, §19; HRS §469-7]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next